New York, session 2025-2026, S10376.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 1019 of the civil practice law and rules is 2 REPEALED. 3 § 2. Section 1023 of the civil practice law and rules is amended to 4 read as follows: 5 § 1023. Public body or officer described by official title. When a 6 public officer, body, board, commission or other public agency may sue 7 or be sued in its official capacity, [it may] that person or entity 8 shall be designated by [its] the official title, subject to the power of 9 the court to require names to be added. 10 § 3. This act shall take effect on the first of January next succeed- 11 ing the date on which it shall have become a law and shall apply to all 12 actions pending on or after such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD15884-01-6